Wyoming statutes. Title 13 Banks, Banking and Finance
Article 5. Remote Electronic Banking Facilities

§ 13-1-501.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

“Wyoming financial institution” means any bank, savings and loan association or trust company chartered or organized under the laws of Wyoming;

“Financial institution” means any bank, savings and loan association, trust company or credit union chartered or organized under the laws of any state other than Wyoming or chartered or organized under the laws of the United States;

Repealed by Laws 1999, ch. 42, § 3.

“Person” means an individual, partnership, corporation, or any other entity, but excludes a Wyoming financial institution and a financial institution;

“Remote electronic terminal” means an electronic device, wherever located, through which a consumer may initiate an electronic funds transfer or may order, instruct or authorize a Wyoming financial institution or financial institution to debit or credit an account and includes an automated teller machine, an automated loan machine or any other machine or device which may be used to carry out electronic banking business. “Remote electronic terminal” does not include point of sale terminals or telephones or personal computers operated by a consumer.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 175, § 1; 1992, ch. 46, § 1; 1997, ch. 75, § 2; 1999, ch. 42, §§ 2, 3.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 13-1-502.
Remote electronic terminals.

A Wyoming financial institution may operate remote electronic terminals without geographic restriction, subject to the requirements and limitations of this article. A financial institution or person may operate remote electronic terminals in this state without geographic restriction, subject to the requirements and limitations of this article.

Repealed by Laws 1992, ch. 46, § 2.

Repealed by Laws 1999, ch. 42, § 3.

A Wyoming financial institution shall not use a remote electronic terminal to replace a branch bank unless the branch bank is to be closed in accordance with the laws of this state and unless the state banking commissioner has approved the closure.

Repealed by Laws 1999, ch. 42, § 3.

A Wyoming financial institution, financial institution or person operating remote electronic terminals in this state may impose a transaction fee for the use of the remote electronic terminal. The amount of the transaction fee shall be disclosed by electronic display at a time and manner that allows a user to terminate or cancel the transaction without incurring the transaction fee.

and (h) Repealed by Laws 1999, ch. 42, § 3.

No person shall operate a remote electronic terminal in this state unless the commissioner has approved a written sponsorship agreement between the person and a Wyoming financial institution or a financial institution having a place of business in this state. Every sponsorship agreement shall include the following information:

The name, address and telephone number of the owner of the remote electronic terminal;

The name and address of the institution;

The names of the network systems that will be utilized;

A list of the location and address where each remote electronic terminal covered by the agreement will be located.

An owner of a remote electronic terminal shall operate the terminal in compliance with applicable federal, state and local laws governing the management, operation and safety of the terminal. No agreement to operate or share a remote electronic terminal shall prohibit, limit or restrict the right of a Wyoming financial institution or other financial institution having a place of business in this state to charge a customer any fee not prohibited by state or federal law. No agreement to operate or share a remote electronic terminal shall require a Wyoming financial institution or other financial institution having a place of business in this state to limit or waive its rights or obligations under this article.

Repealed by Laws 2017, ch. 23, § 2.

A Wyoming financial institution or person operating a remote electronic terminal in this state who, after receiving notice from the commissioner, fails to comply with any of the provisions of this section or rule or regulation adopted pursuant to this section, is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100.00) nor more than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00), imprisonment for not more than one (1) year, or both.

The attorney general, upon request from the commissioner, may bring an action in a court of competent jurisdiction for an injunction to enjoin a Wyoming financial institution, a financial institution or person from violating any of the provisions of this article or any rule adopted pursuant to this article. No injunction shall be granted unless the commissioner, prior to seeking the injunction, provided written notice of the violation to the institution or person sought to be enjoined.

A Wyoming financial institution, financial institution or person operating a remote electronic terminal in this state may enter into an agreement with the department of state parks and cultural resources to provide users a voluntary opportunity to donate funds for the operation and maintenance of state parks, historic sites and recreation areas. The opportunity for donation shall be disclosed visually by electronic display in a manner that suggests an amount of donation, allows a user to designate the amount of the donation desired, or make no donation if so desired by the user. No additional charges for making the donation shall be charged to the user by the Wyoming financial institution, financial institution or person operating the remote electronic terminal. The department of state parks and cultural resources and the Wyoming financial institution, financial institution or person operating the remote electronic terminal may include in the agreement provisions for retention of a portion of the donated funds as an administrative fee in an amount not to exceed ten percent (10%) of the donations collected or five dollars ($5.00) per transaction, whichever is less.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 175, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1; 1992, ch. 46, §§ 1, 2; 1995, ch. 204, § 1; 1997, ch. 131, § 1; 1999, ch. 42, §§ 2, 3; 2011, ch. 62, § 1; 2012, ch. 59, § 1; 2013 ch. 24, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2014 ch. 9, § 1, effective March 4, 2014; 2017 ch. 23, § 2, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2011 amendment,

in (f), deleted “up to a maximum of two dollars ($2.00)” after “may be imposed.”

Laws 2011, ch. 62, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 22, 2011.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, in (f), deleted the former last sentence which read: “A transaction fee may be imposed per transaction as established by rules and regulations of the commissioner.”

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, deleted “visually by placard and” from the second sentence in (f).

The 2014 amendment,

added (p).

Laws 2014, ch. 9, § 2, makes this act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, §
8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved Mach 4, 2014.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, deleted (m), which formerly read: “Each
remote electronic terminal operated in this state shall be registered
with the commissioner. The banking commissioner may impose an annual
fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for the registration of each
remote
electronic terminal.”

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) or (l) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.